Hawaii statutes.
§167-3 Engineering program administrator. The
board of agriculture shall appoint a registered professional engineer who shall
act as engineering program administrator of the irrigation water development
program and have such qualifications as the board may deem necessary. The
appointment and removal of the engineering program administrator shall be in
accordance with chapter 76 and the engineering program administrator shall
perform the duties as set forth by the board. [L 1987, c 306, pt of §1; am L 2000,
c 253, §150; am L 2013, c 107, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next